Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1448.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 132.1. Financial Transparency Data and Reporting System.--(a) The department shall develop and implement a basic education funding transparency data and reporting system.(b) The system shall consist of a longitudinal data system that incorporates the following:(1) Basic education funding subsidies and appropriations.(2) Revenue and expenditure data for no less than the last ten (10) years disaggregated by school entity.(3) Data visualization dashboards that simulate changes to 1234567891011121314151617181920 the basic education funding formula, such as changing weights and measures of funding appropriations, overall funding support and distributions of funding based on school characteristics. The data visualization dashboards shall be accessible to appropriate staff at State agencies and the General Assembly.(c) To ensure reliability of data and accuracy of reporting, the system shall:(1) Be unbiased regarding data type and capable of accessing and integrating any data type from any data system across participating feeder systems from State agencies, school entities and other partners.(2) Have advanced data management capabilities to clean and prepare data, create master records and flag any data errors or missing data.(3) Have automated data governance capabilities to audit and track the lineage of data edits and changes by different authorized users.(4) Have advanced analytics functionality, including data mining and machine learning capabilities to analyze the longitudinal data for program evaluation and apply predictive analytics for forecasting and projections into the future and natural language processing that allows partner entities to analyze large volumes of text found in surveys, grants, accreditation reports and other text-heavy documents.(5) Have business intelligence capabilities for State agencies, school entities and other partners to easily generate reporting and visualizations through a low-code or no-code drag-and-drop interface.(6) Include public-facing dashboards that only include aggregate-level data that is appropriate for the general public 20250HB1448PN1693 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to view.(7) Include restricted dashboards and environments for State agencies, school entities and other partners to view data that is subject to the protections of the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (Public Law 90-247, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g) with role-based permissions.(8) Support data exchanges and interoperability with the department and other existing data systems in the Commonwealth to be identified by the department.(9) Ensure routine and ongoing compliance with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 and other relevant Federal and State privacy laws and regulations, by:(i) using de-identified data in data research and public reporting;(ii) implementing the Commonwealth's established policy for small cell suppression;(iii) disposing of information that is no longer needed;(iv) providing data security, including the capacity for audit trails;(v) performing regular audits for compliance with data privacy and security standards; and(vi) implementing guidelines and policies that prevent the reporting of any potentially identifying data.(d) The department may expand the system to include allocations, revenues, disbursements and expenditures at the local school entity level.(e) The department may contract with third parties to develop the system. A contract awarded under this section shall be subject to 62 Pa.C.S. Pt. I (relating to Commonwealth Procurement Code).20250HB1448PN1693 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) The department may use Federal, State and other money appropriated or otherwise made available for the program.(g) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Longitudinal data system." A data system that collects data from the same population or entities over multiple years."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school or multiple charter school organization."Small cell suppression." A disclosure limitation method to protect student privacy when reporting data that involves removing or suppressing data from cells in data tables to prevent the identification of individuals in small groups or those with unique characteristics."System." The financial transparency data and reporting system established by this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1448PN1693 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021